South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4753.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 111, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-111-35. (A) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings: (1) "Athletic trainer" has the same meaning as in Section 40-47-1710(1). (2) "Athletic Trainers' Advisory Committee" or "Committee" means the committee established pursuant to Section 40-47-1720. (3) "Board of Certification for the Athletic Trainer or Board of Certification, Inc." or "BOC" means the organization for certified athletic trainers as provided in Section 40-47-1710(4). (4) "Board of Medical Examiners" means the board established pursuant to Section 40-47-10. (5) "Commission on Higher Education" or "Commission" means the commission established pursuant to Chapter 103. (B)(1) This section must be administered by the Commission on Higher Education in consultation with the Athletic Trainers' Advisory Committee. (2) A percentage not to exceed ten percent of any annual appropriations received by the program may be expended for the operation and administrative requirements provided in this section. (3) The requirements of this section are contingent upon available funding for the program. (4) The commission, in consultation with the committee, may adopt rules for the administration and implementation of this section. (C)(1) The Commission on Higher Education, in consultation with the State Department of Education and Board of Medical Examiners, shall develop an "Athletic Trainers' Loan Assistance Grants Program" to provide certified athletic trainers in the public schools of this State grants not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars per year worked or three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars per semester worked, for a maximum of four consecutive years. The purpose of the grants is to help recipients with the repayment of subsidized or unsubsidized federal student loans incurred in obtaining education required for licensure as a certified athletic trainer. If there are insufficient funds in the Education Lottery Account to provide the grant to each eligible recipient for a particular year, priority must be given to those athletic trainers who serve geographic areas of critical need as determined by the State Department of Education. (2) The commission may award loan assistance from the program to eligible applicants. To be eligible for loan assistance, an applicant must: (a) be a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the United States; (b) hold an approved degree from an approved institution, each of which must have been approved by the Board of Certification for the Athletic Trainer or Board of Certification, Inc. for the purpose of satisfying the BOC's requirements to become a certified athletic trainer; (c) be licensed and in good standing with the Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to Article 11, Chapter 47, Title 40; (d) provide an average of at least twenty hours of athletic training services per week at qualifying institutions throughout the year in this State; (e) have outstanding subsidized or unsubsidized federal student loans; and (f) satisfy additional continuing eligibility criteria established by the commission in consultation with the Athletic Trainers' Advisory Committee. (3) Loan assistance awards must be distributed directly to eligible applicants in two disbursements during the applicable year with one disbursement being made after January first and the second disbursement being made after June first. (4) An eligible applicant must notify the commission in writing of any change in status within thirty days after the change. Failure to notify the commission of a change in status must affect future eligibility. A change in status includes a change in: (a) name; (b) residence; or (c) employment status. (5) The commission shall inform an eligible applicant awarded loan assistance that loan assistance is considered income by the Internal Revenue Service. (6)(a) The commission shall determine the necessary procedures for awarding loan assistance if an eligible applicant's total awards exceed available funding. (b) The commission shall prioritize loan assistance to eligible educators prior to awarding loan assistance to eligible licensed athletic trainers. (D) An individual or institution not satisfied with the commission's actions in administering the program may submit a written petition to the commission within thirty days after notice of the action. If the individual or institution is not satisfied with the commission's response, the individual or institution may request a rehearing within twenty days after receipt of the response. The commission shall schedule the rehearing within twenty days after receiving the rehearing request. The individual or institution may present written and oral evidence supporting the petition and may be represented by counsel. The decision of the commission following the rehearing is final. (E) The commission shall develop an accountability and evaluation plan for the program that: (1) identifies the goals, objectives, and expected outputs and outcomes of the program; (2) describes the specific activities of the program and how those activities will achieve expected outcomes; (3) defines the expected metrics of success and provides a monitoring plan to regularly assess performance; and (4) provides an evaluation plan to assess the impact of expected outcomes. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----